Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Chapter 2 Parents

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Sufficiency of evidence to establish parent's knowledge or allowance of child's sexual abuse by another under statute permitting termination of parental rights for “allowing” or “knowingly allowing” such abuse to occur, 53 ALR5th 499.

Library References.

Family Law and Practice §§ 20.05, 63.02 (Matthew Bender).